en: mixture of melted cheeses and powdered cheeses
hr: mješavina topljenih sireva i sireva u prahu
it: miscela di formaggi fusi e formaggi in polvere

en: semi-hard cheeses
hr: polutvrdi sirevi, polutvrdi sir
sl: poltrdi sir

en: hard cheese
ca: formatge de pasta dura, formatge dur
de: Hartkäse
es: queso duro, queso de pasa dura
fi: kova juusto
fr: fromage à pâte dure
hr: tvrdi sirevi
hu: keménysajt
it: formaggio a pasta dura
nl: harde kaas
pl: ser twardy
pt: queijo de pasta dura, queijo duro
sv: Hårdost

en: semi-hard and hard cheeses
hr: polutvrdi i tvrdi sirevi

en: medium fat hard cheese
de: Hartkäse Fettstufe
hr: srednje masni tvrdi sir
it: formaggio duro medio grasso

en: soft cheese
de: Weichkäse
fr: Fromage à pâte molle
hr: meki sirevi
nl: zachte kaas

en: skimmed milk soft cheese, reduced fat soft cheese, low fat soft cheese
de: Frischkäse Magerstufe, Frischkäse aus entrahmter Milch
hr: obrano mlijeko meki sir
it: formaggio a pasta molle a base di latte scremato

en: medium fat soft cheese
de: Frischkäse (Fettstufe), Frischkäsezubereitung der Fettstufe
hr: srednje masni meki sir
it: formaggio morbido medio-grasso

en: full fat soft cheese
de: Vollfett-Frischkäse, Vollfett-Weichkäse, Frischkäse Vollfettstufe
fr: Fromage à pâte molle au lait entier
hr: punomasni meki sir
it: formaggio molle intero

ca: formatge tendre
es: queso tierno

en: Swiss cheese
ca: formatge suís
de: Schweizer Käse
es: queso suizo
fr: fromage suisse
hr: švicarski sir
it: formaggio svizzero, formaggi svizzeri
nl: Zwitserse kaas

en: paneer
xx: paneer
hi: पनीर

en: cheese sauce
de: Käsesoße
es: salsa de queso
fi: juustokastike
fr: sauce au fromage
hr: umak od sira
it: salsa al formaggio
nl: kaassaus
sv: ostsås

en: Abondance, Abondance cheese from cow's milk
xx: abondance
ar: أبوندانس
eo: fromaĝo de Abundeco
hy: Աբոնդանս
it: Abondance, formaggio Abondance
ja: アボンダンス
ko: 아봉당스
ru: Абонданс
uk: Абонданс

en: Asiago, Asiago cheese
xx: Asiago
ar: اسياجو
es: queso asiago, queso asiago
fr: Asiago AOP, fromage asiago, fromage Asiago AOP
it: formaggio Asiago, formaggio Asiago DOP
ja: アジアーゴ・チーズ
ko: 아시아고
ru: Азиаго
uk: Азіаго
zh: 艾斯阿格芝士

en: asiago medium cheese
de: Asiago-Käse Medium, Asiago jung
hr: asiago srednji sir
it: formaggio Asiago medio

en: Beaufort, Beaufort cheese from cow's milk
xx: Beaufort
ar: بوفور
bg: Бофор
ca: formatge Beaufort DOP
cv: Бофор
es: queso Beaufort DOP
fr: beaufort aop, Beaufort Appellation d'Origine Protégée, Beaufort ROP/BOB, Beaufort au lait cru Appellation d'Origine Protégée
hu: Beaufort sajt
ja: ボーフォール
ko: 보포르
ru: Бофор
uk: Бофор
zh: 博福尔奶酪

en: Brie, brie cheese
xx: Brie
ar: بري
be: Бры
bg: бри
bn: ব্রাই
ca: formatge Brie
cv: Бри
de: Brie
el: Μπρι
eo: Brio
es: queso brie
et: Brie juust
fa: پنیر بری
fr: Brie
he: ברי
hi: ब्राई
hy: բրի
ka: ბრი
ko: 브리
lt: Bri
ro: Brânză de Brie
ru: бри
th: บรี
uk: Брі
zh: 布利乾酪

en: Brie de Meaux, Brie de Meaux cheese from cow's milk
xx: Brie de Meaux
fr: Brie de Meaux AOP
ja: ブリー・ド・モー
ko: 브리 드 모
th: บรีเดอโม
zh: 莫城布里

en: Brie de Melun, Brie de Melun cheese from cow's milk
xx: Brie de Melun
zh: 默倫布里